hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Ragbi: Odjeća za ragbi; Torbe za ragbi; Lopte za ragbi; Rukavice za ragbi; Dodaci za stupove za ragbi; Stupovi za ragbi; Zaštitna oprema za ragbi; Tenisice za ragbi; Pomagala za trening ragbija
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng bầu dục: Trang phục bóng bầu dục; Túi đựng đồ bóng bầu dục; Bóng rugby; Găng tay chơi rugby; Phụ kiện cột gôn bóng bầu dục; Cột gôn bóng bầu dục; Thiết bị bảo vệ bóng bầu dục; Giày chơi bóng bầu dục; Dụng cụ tập luyện bóng bầu dục
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Ръгби: Облекло за ръгби; Чанти за ръгби; Топки за ръгби; Ръкавици за ръгби; Аксесоари за стълбове за ръгби; Стълбове за ръгби; Защитна екипировка за ръгби; Обувки за ръгби; Помощни средства за тренировка по ръгби
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Ragbi: Ragbi giyim ürünleri; Ragbi çantaları; Ragbi Topları; Ragbi Eldivenleri; Ragbi kale direği aksesuarları; Ragbi Kaleleri; Ragbi Koruyucu Kıyafetleri; Ragbi Ayakkabıları; Ragbi Eğitim Ekipmanları
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Rúgbi: Vestuário de rugby; Bolsas para rugby; Bolas de rúgbi; Luvas de rúgbi; Acessórios para traves de rugby; Postes de rúgbi; Equipamento de proteção para rúgbi; Sapatos de Rugby; Equipamentos de treinamento de rúgbi
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Rugby: Rugbykleding; Rugbytassen; Rugbyballen; Rugbyhandschoenen; Accessoires voor rugbypalen; Rugbypalen; Beschermende uitrusting voor rugby; Rugbyschoenen; Benodigdheden voor rugbytraining
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Rugby: Abbigliamento da rugby; Borse da rugby; Palloni da rugby; Guanti da rugby; Accessori per pali da rugby; Pali da rugby; Protezioni per rugby; Scarpe da rugby; Attrezzatura allenamento rugby
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Râguebi: Vestuário de râguebi; Sacos de râguebi; Bolas de râguebi; Luvas de râguebi; Acessórios para postes de râguebi; Postes de râguebi; Equipamento de proteção para râguebi; Sapatos de râguebi; Auxiliares de treino para râguebi
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Ράγκμπι: Ένδυση ράγκμπι; Τσάντες ράγκμπι; Μπάλες ράγκμπι; Γάντια ράγκμπι; Αξεσουάρ δοκαριών ράγκμπι; Στύλοι για ράγκμπι; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός για ράγκμπι; Παπούτσια ράγκμπι; Προπονητικά βοηθήματα για ράγκμπι
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Rugby: Rugbyvaatteet; Rugbykassit; Rugby-pallot; Rugby-hanskat; Rugbypylväiden lisävarusteet; Rugby-tolpat; Rugby-suojat; Rugbykengät; Rugby-harjoittelutarvikkeet
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Регби: Одежда для регби; Сумки для регби; Мячи для регби; Перчатки для регби; Аксессуары для регбийных ворот; Ворота для регби; Защитная экипировка для регби; Обувь для регби; Тренировочный инвентарь для регби
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Rugby: Kläder för rugby; Rugbyväskor; Rugbybollar; Rugbyhandskar; Tillbehör för rugbymålstolpar; Rugbystolpar; Skyddsutrustning för rugby; Rugbyskor; Träningsutrustning för rugby
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Rugby: Beklædning til rugby; Rugbytasker; Rugbybolde; Rugbyhandsker; Tilbehør til rugbymål; Rugbystænger; Beskyttelsesudstyr til rugby; Rugbystøvler; Træningsudstyr til rugby
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > รักบี้: เครื่องแต่งกายรักบี้; กระเป๋ารักบี้; ลูกรักบี้; ถุงมือรักบี้; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเสารักบี้; เสารักบี้; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันของรักบี้; รองเท้ารักบี้; อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมรักบี้
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 橄欖球: 橄欖球服飾; 橄欖球袋; 橄欖球用球; 橄欖球手套; 橄欖球球門柱配件; 橄欖球立柱; 橄欖球護具; 橄欖球鞋; 橄欖球訓練輔具
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Ragby: Ragbyové oblečení; Tašky na ragby; Ragbyové míče; Ragbyové rukavice; Příslušenství k ragbyovým brankám; Ragbyové branky; Ragbyové chrániče; Boty na ragby; Ragbyové tréninkové pomůcky
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 럭비: 럭비 의류; 럭비 가방; 럭비공; 럭비용 장갑; 럭비 골대 액세서리; 럭비 포스트; 럭비 보호 장비; 럭비화; 럭비 훈련 장비
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Rugby: Îmbrăcăminte pentru rugby; Genți pentru rugby; Mingi de rugby; Mănuși de rugby; Accesorii pentru stâlpi de rugby; Stâlpi de rugby; Echipamente de protecție pentru rugby; Pantofi de rugby; Articole pentru antrenament rugby
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Rugby: Vêtements de rugby; Sacs de rugby; Ballons de rugby; Gants de rugby; Accessoires de poteaux de rugby; Poteaux de rugby; Protections de rugby; Chaussures de rugby; Matériel d’entraînement de rugby
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Rögbi: Rögbi ruházat; Rögbitáskák; Rögbilabdák; Rögbikesztyűk; Rögbikapu-kiegészítők; Rögbioszlopok; Rögbi-védőfelszerelés; Rögbicipők; Rögbi edzési segédeszközök
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Rugby: Ropa de rugby; Bolsos de rugby; Balones de rugby; Guantes de rugby; Accesorios para postes de rugby; Postes de rugby; Equipamiento de protección para rugby; Calzado de rugby; Equipo de entrenamiento de rugby
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Rugby: Rugbyklær; Rugbybager; Rugbyballer; Rugbyhansker; Tilbehør til målstenger for rugby; Rugbystenger; Beskyttelsesutstyr for rugby; Rugbysko; Opplæringshjelp for rugby
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Regbis: Regbio apranga; Regbio krepšiai; Regbio kamuoliai; Regbio pirštinės; Regbio vartų priedai; Regbio virpstai; Regbio apsauginės priemonės; Regbio bateliai; Regbio treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Ragbi: Oblačila za ragbi; Vreče za rugby; Žoge za ragbi; Rokavice za ragbi; Dodatki za vratnice za ragbi; Vratnice za ragbi; Zaščitna oprema za ragbi; Čevlji za ragbi; Pripomočki za vadbo ragbija
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Rugby: Odzież do rugby; Torby do rugby; Piłki do rugby; Rękawice do rugby; Akcesoria do bramek do rugby; Słupki do rugby; Ochraniacze do rugby; Buty do rugby; Sprzęt treningowy do rugby
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Ragby: Oblečenie na rugby; Tašky na rugby; Lopty na rugby; Rukavice na rugby; Príslušenstvo pre bránky na ragby; Stĺpiky na ragby; Ochranné vybavenie na rugby; Obuv na rugby; Tréningové pomôcky na rugby
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Rugby: Rugby-Bekleidung; Rugby-Taschen; Rugby-Bälle; Rugby-Handschuhe; Zubehör für Rugby-Tore; Rugby-Tore; Rugby-Schutzkleidung; Rugby-Schuhe; Rugby-Trainingsausrüstung
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > ラグビー: ラグビー用アパレル; ラグビー用バッグ; ラグビーボール; ラグビー用グローブ; ラグビーポストアクセサリー; ラグビーポスト; ラグビー用プロテクター; ラグビーシューズ; ラグビー練習器具
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Rugby: Rugby Apparel; Rugby Bags; Rugby Balls; Rugby Gloves; Rugby Post Accessories; Rugby Posts; Rugby Protective Gear; Rugby Shoes; Rugby Training Aids
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 英式橄榄球用品: 橄榄球服饰; 橄榄球包; 英式橄榄球用球; 英式橄榄球手套; 橄榄球球门柱配件; 英式橄榄球门柱; 英式橄榄球护具; 英式橄榄球鞋; 英式橄榄球训练辅助用品